Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.230

Action on bond for failure to comply with chapter.

The director or any consignor of an agricultural product may also bring action upon said bond against both principal and surety in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the damages caused by any failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted hereunder. Any consignor undertaking such an action shall name the director as a party.

[ 1986 c 178 s 11; 1959 c 139 s 23.]